District of Columbia statutes.
22-4009

Change of address or other information.

(a)

The Agency shall have the authority to adopt and implement procedures and requirements for the reporting by sex offenders of changes in address and changes in other information required for registration.

(b)

(1)

The Agency shall have the authority to notify the responsible registration agency or authorities in any other jurisdiction to which a sex offender moves, or in which a sex offender works or attends school.

(2)

The Agency shall have the authority to provide to the responsible agency or authorities in the other jurisdiction all information concerning the sex offender that may be necessary or useful for registration of the sex offender in that jurisdiction, or for purposes of risk assessment, community notification, or other comparable functions in that jurisdiction.

History

July 11, 2000, D.C. Law 13-137, § 10, 47 DCR 797